Utah statutes.
72-9-201.   Motor Carrier Advisory Board created -- Appointment -- Terms --
Meetings -- Per diem and expenses -- Duties.
(1)  There is created within the department the Motor Carrier Advisory Board
consisting of five members appointed by the governor.
(2)  Each member of the board shall:
(a)  represent experience and expertise in the areas of motor carrier
transportation, commerce, agriculture, economics, shipping, or highway safety;
(b)  be selected at large on a nonpartisan basis; and
(c)  have been a legal resident of the state for at least one year immediately
preceding the date of appointment.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed
member to a four-year term.
(b) The governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust
the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so
that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  A member shall serve from the date of appointment until a replacement is
appointed.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term beginning the day following the
expiration of the preceding term.
(5)  The board shall elect its own chair and vice chair at the first regular
meeting of each calendar year.
(6)  The board shall meet at least quarterly or as needed when called by the
chair.
(7)  Any three voting members constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business that comes before the board.
(8)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(9)  The board shall advise the department and the commission on
interpretation, adoption, and implementation of this chapter and other motor
carrier related issues.
(10)  The department shall provide staff support to the board.
